Utah statutes.
53B-16-208.   Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah -- Career and technical education advisory committee -- Membership -- Duties.

(1)  Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah shall have a career and technical education advisory committee composed of the following 11 members:

(a)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Carbon School District;

(b)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Emery School District;

(c)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Grand School District;

(d)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the San Juan School District;

(e)  one member of the Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah Regional Advisory Council appointed by the chancellor of Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah; and

(f)  six representatives of business or industry within the region appointed by the chancellor of Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah from members of the program advisory committees overseeing career and technical education in the region.

(2)  The career and technical education advisory committee shall:

(a)  after consulting with Utah State University-College of Eastern Utah, school districts, and charter schools within its region, prepare a comprehensive strategic plan for delivering career and technical education within its region;

(b)  make recommendations regarding what skills are needed for employment in Utah businesses and industries;

(c)  recommend programs based upon the information gathered in accordance with Subsection (2)(b);

(d)  review annual program evaluations;

(e)  provide counsel, support, and recommendations for updating and improving the effectiveness of career and technical education programs and services, including expedited program approval and termination of procedures, consistent with Board of Regents' policy;

(f)  monitor program advisory committees and other advisory groups to provide counsel, support, and recommendations for updating and improving the effectiveness of training programs and services; and

(g)  coordinate with local school boards, districts, and charter schools to meet the career and technical education needs of secondary students.

